Illinois, session 104th, SB141.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Section 2705-275 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-275)  (was 20 ILCS 2705/49.25j)8    Sec. 2705-275. Grants for airport facilities. 9    (a) In this Section, "project labor agreement" shall have 10the same meaning given to that term in the Project Labor 11Agreements Act. 12    (b) The Department may make grants to municipalities and 13airport authorities for the renovation, construction, and 14development of airport facilities. A grant made under this 15Section must include a condition that the renovation, 16construction, and development of airport facilities is covered 17by a project labor agreement entered into with the local 18building and construction trades council having geographic 19jurisdiction over the airport facilities. The grants may be 20made from funds appropriated for that purpose from the Build 21Illinois Bond Fund.22(Source: P.A. 94-91, eff. 7-1-05.)   SB0141- 2 -LRB104 05137 RTM 15166 b1    Section 10. The Airport Authorities Act is amended by 2adding Section 15.3 as follows: 3    (70 ILCS 5/15.3 new)4    Sec. 15.3. Project Labor Agreement.5    (a) In this Section, "project labor agreement" shall have 6the same meaning given to that term in the Project Labor 7Agreements Act.8    (b) Any contract entered into by an Airport Authority to 9construct, develop, expand, extend, or improve any airport or 10airport facility must include a project labor agreement 11entered into with the local building and construction trades 12council having geographic jurisdiction over the airport or 13airport facility. 14    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 15Section 8.49 as follows: 16    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)17    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 188 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 19the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 20Act of the 104th General Assembly.